Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. Education Loan Program.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, §§ 20-22.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, §§ 32-34.

Validity and application of provisions governing determination of residency for purposes of fixing fee differential for out-of-state students in public college. 56 ALR3d 641.

Increase in tuition as actionable in suit by student against college or university. 99 ALR3d 885.

Absence from or inability to attend school or college as affecting liability for or right to recover payments for tuition or board. 20 ALR4th 303.

Sec. 14.43.090.
Scholarship revolving loan fund. [Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 14.43.091.
Education loan program.

There is created the education loan program to provide loans to individuals who are students to assist in paying the costs of postsecondary education. The provisions of this section, AS

14.43.100

—

14.43.160

,

14.43.910

,

14.43.920

, and

14.43.990

apply to the loans.

Upon approval by the commission of an education loan, the corporation shall finance a loan disbursement, subject to any limit that the corporation sets on the total amount of loans that the corporation will finance in a school year. A loan financed under this section becomes an asset of the corporation.

Repayments of principal and interest on a loan are paid into the education loan fund established in AS

14.42.210

. If money made available by the corporation is inadequate to fully finance eligible loan applications, additional financing from the general fund may be requested and appropriated for that year.

History.

(§ 17 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Sec. 14.43.095.
Financial aid committee. [Repealed, § 29 ch 43 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 14.43.100.
Applications.

Applications shall be submitted to the executive director of the commission.

A person whose loan application is not approved by the executive director of the commission may appeal to the commission and the commission shall consider the application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 156 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 58 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 4, 5 ch 43 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.755. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.105.
Administration of program.

The executive director shall administer the programs subject to review by the commission and in accordance with the regulations adopted by the commission. The adoption of these regulations is subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). A summary of the regulations shall be distributed to each applicant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 43 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.757. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For scholarship loans, see 20 AAC 15, art. 1.

For AlaskAdvantage consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 4.

Sec. 14.43.110.
Education loans.

In a school year, the commission may make a loan not to exceed

$8,500 to a full-time undergraduate student or $5,000 to a half-time undergraduate student attending a college or university if the full- or half-time student is otherwise eligible under AS

14.43.125

;

$9,500 to a full-time graduate student or $4,500 to a half-time graduate student attending a college or university if the full- or half-time graduate student is otherwise eligible under AS

14.43.125

;

$5,500 to a full-time student or $2,000 to a half-time student if the full- or half-time student is attending a career education program that is at least six weeks in length and is otherwise eligible under AS 14.43.125.

The commission may make a loan for a summer term, even if the total loan for the school year exceeds the limit imposed under (a) of this section if the loan for the summer term is counted against the limit imposed under (a) of this section for the following school year.

The commission shall adopt regulations establishing a minimum amount for which a loan may be made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 136 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 153 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1986; am § 7 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.759. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.115.
Graduate loans. [Repealed § 26 ch 5 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 14.43.120.
Conditions of loans.

Proceeds from an education loan to a full-time student may only be used for books and supplies, tuition and required fees, loan origination fees, and room and board. Proceeds from an education loan to a half-time student may only be used for books and supplies, tuition and required fees, and loan origination fees.

Education loans may only be used to attend a

career education program operating on a sound fiscal basis that has

operated for two years before the borrower attends; and

submitted an executed program participation agreement as required by the commission; or

college or university that

has operated for at least two years before the borrower attends;

is accredited by a national or regional accreditation association recognized by the Council for Higher Education Accreditation or is approved by the commission;

if the loans are federally insured, is approved by the United States Secretary of Education;

is a degree granting institution; and

has submitted an executed program participation agreement as required by the commission.

To maintain a loan awarded to a full-time student the student must continue to be enrolled as a full-time student in good standing in a career education program, college, or university that meets the requirements under (b) of this section. To maintain a loan awarded to a half-time student, the student must continue to be enrolled as a half-time student in good standing in (1) a career education program, college, or university in the state that meets the requirements under (b) of this section, or (2) a career education program, college, or university that meets the requirements under (b) of this section, and be physically present in the state while attending the career education program, college, or university. The commission shall adopt regulations defining “good standing” for purposes of this subsection.

Education loans may not be made to a student

for more than a total of $42,500 for undergraduate study;

for more than a total of $47,500 for graduate study;

for more than a combined total of $60,000 for undergraduate and graduate study;

to attend an institution if the total amount of education loans made to students to attend that institution exceeds $100,000 and the default rate on those loans is (A) greater than 20 percent but less than 25 percent, and the institution is unable to reduce its default rate within 24 months after the rate determination; or (B) equal to or greater than 25 percent for two consecutive calendar years; for purposes of this paragraph, the default rate shall be determined by the commission for each annual group of loans required to be repaid under (g) of this section on or after July 1, 1996; if an education loan is refused based on the provisions of this paragraph and, under a subsequent default rate determination, an institution’s default rate does not exceed the limits established under this paragraph, the commission may not refuse to issue an education loan to attend that institution based on the provisions of this paragraph.

Interest on an education loan accrues from the time the loan is disbursed; however, the state shall pay the interest while the borrower continues to be enrolled under (c) of this section.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

A borrower’s obligation to commence repayment of the principal and interest on the loan begins six months after the borrower is no longer enrolled under (c) of this section. The borrower shall repay the total amount owed in periodic installments of at least $50 a month over a period of not more than 15 years from the commencement of the repayment obligation. If the commission and the borrower agree to a different repayment schedule, the borrower shall repay the loan in accordance with the agreement. A borrower may make payments earlier than required by this subsection or the agreement.

Security may not be required for a loan; however, a loan origination fee, as specified in (u) of this section, shall be deducted at the time that the loan is disbursed. Additionally, the borrower shall pay all fees and costs incurred in collection on the loan if it becomes delinquent or in default.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 54 SLA 1997.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 92 SLA 1987.]

A borrower’s obligation to make periodic payments of principal shall be deferred, but the borrower’s obligation to pay interest shall continue, unless the state pays the interest by appropriation under (t) of this section, during any of the following periods:

return to full-time student status in good standing in a career education program, college, or university that meets the requirements under (b) of this section;

if the borrower received a loan to attend as a half-time student, return to

half-time student status in good standing in a career education program, college, or university in the state that meets the requirements under (b) of this section;

at least half-time student status in good standing in a career education program, college, or university that meets the requirements under (b) of this section, and the borrower is physically present in the state while attending the career education program, college, or university; a borrower is not eligible for deferral under this paragraph for a period longer than eight years; or

full-time student status in good standing in a career education program, college, or university that meets the requirements under (b) of this section;

serving an initial period of up to three years on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States;

serving, for up to three years, as a full-time volunteer under the Peace Corps Act;

serving, for up to three years, as a full-time volunteer under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973;

serving, for up to two years, as a full-time volunteer under the National and Community Service Trust Act of 1993 (AmeriCorps);

for a one-time period up to 12 months in which the borrower is seeking and unable to find employment in the United States; or

during the period of disability if, after the loan is disbursed, the borrower becomes totally disabled as certified by competent medical authority.

The state shall pay the interest on that portion of a loan that is not federally insured during

the period while the borrower continues to be enrolled under (c) of this section; and

deferments under (k) of this section.

In case of hardship, the commission may extend repayment of a loan for an additional period of up to five years.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 89 SLA 1981.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 92 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 54 SLA 1997.]

The rate of interest, time of payment of an installment of principal or interest, or other terms of an education loan may be modified if required to establish or maintain tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. 103 (Internal Revenue Code of 1986), as amended, for the interest on bonds issued by the Alaska Student Loan Corporation.

A portion of a loan shall be forgiven by the state if, after being enrolled in the course of study for which the loan was granted, the borrower is a student who is unable to complete the school term as a result of serving on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States. The portion of the loan that shall be forgiven by the state is equal to the amount borrowed by the student for the school term in which the borrower’s studies are terminated.

Payment of interest under (l) of this section and forgiveness under (s) of this section are subject to appropriation by the legislature. Money obtained from the sale of bonds by the Student Loan Corporation under AS

14.42.220

may not be appropriated for the payment of interest or the forgiveness of loans.

The corporation by regulation shall set a loan origination fee, not to exceed five percent of the total education loan amount, to be assessed upon an education loan that is funded from the education loan fund of the corporation. The loan origination fee shall be deducted by the commission at the time the loan is disbursed. The loan origination fees shall be deposited into an origination fee account within the education loan fund of the corporation, and subsequently used by the corporation to offset losses incurred as a result of death, disability, default, or bankruptcy of the borrower.

[Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 156 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 78 SLA 1974; am § 8 ch 136 SLA 1974; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 99 SLA 1977; am §§ 3 — 8 ch 87 SLA 1979; am §§ 3 — 9, 11 ch 89 SLA 1981; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 158 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 65 SLA 1986; am §§ 5 — 9, 19 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1989; am §§ 9 — 15 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1991; am §§ 36 — 38 ch 63 SLA 1993; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 112 SLA 1994; am §§ 2 — 14 ch 5 SLA 1996; am § 18 ch 32 SLA 1997; am §§ 4, 5, 18 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1997; am § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000; am §§ 18 — 20 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 2004; am §§ 16, 45 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.763. Renumbered in 1982.

In 1987, “Secretary” was substituted for “Commissioner” in (b)(2)(C) of this section to conform to the change in federal law.

In 2001, in accordance with § 45(b) and (d), “education loan” was substituted for “student loan” in subsections (b), (d), (e), (r), and (u) and “education loan fund” was substituted for “student loan fund” in subsection (u).

Administrative Code. —

For scholarship loans, see 20 AAC 15, art. 1.

For A.W. “Winn” Brindle memorial scholarship loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (b)(2), made a stylistic change, and in (b)(2)(B) substituted “Council for Higher Education Accreditation” for “Council on Recognition of Postsecondary Accreditation”; and repealed (f) and (v).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 28, ch. 5, SLA 1996 provides that the borrower’s obligation to pay interest on a student loan, as required under the amendment of (k) of this section made by § 9, ch. 5, SLA 1996, “applies to a scholarship loan disbursed after June 30, 1996.”

Sec. 14.43.122.
Consolidation of loans.

The corporation may offer a borrower who has received more than one education loan the option of consolidating the multiple loans into a single loan as provided in this section.

For a borrower to be eligible for consolidation of a loan under this section, the borrower must apply on a form approved by the corporation and provide proof satisfactory to the corporation that the borrower

physically resides in the state and has maintained a domicile in the state for not less than 12 consecutive months before submitting an application for consolidation;

has not been physically absent from the state for more than 60 days in the 12 months before submitting an application for consolidation;

has not declared residency in another state;

has not received a benefit of residency in another state.

In this section, “education loan” means a loan to finance the cost of attendance at a postsecondary institution in or outside the state.

History.

(§ 5 ch 112 SLA 1994; am § 21 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 7, 31 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 17 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, rewrote the section, expanding the description of the requirements for eligibility for consolidation of a loan and adding the definition of “education loan”.

Sec. 14.43.125.
Eligibility of students.

A person is eligible for a loan if the person

is

enrolled as a full-time student in a career education, associate, baccalaureate, or graduate degree program;

enrolled as a half-time student in a career education, associate, baccalaureate, or graduate degree program

in the state; or

out of the state and is physically present in this state while attending that program; or

a graduate of a high school or the equivalent, or scheduled for graduation from a high school within six months, who, at the time of loan disbursement, will be enrolled in compliance with (A) or (B) of this paragraph;

is not delinquent and has never been in default on a loan previously awarded by the commission;

is a resident of the state at the time of application for the loan; for purposes of this section, a person qualifies as a resident of the state if at the time of application for the loan the person

has been physically present in the state for at least one year immediately before the time of application for the loan with the intent to remain indefinitely;

is dependent on a parent or guardian for care, the parent or guardian has been present in the state for at least one year immediately before the time of application for the loan with the intent to remain indefinitely, and the person has been present in the state for at least one year of the immediately preceding five years except that the commission may by a two-thirds vote, acting upon a written appeal by the person, grant an exemption to the requirement that the person has been present in the state for one year of the immediately preceding five years;

has been physically present in the state for at least one year immediately before the applicant was absent from the state, the person intends to return permanently to the state, and the absence is due solely to

serving an initial period of up to three years on active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States;

serving for up to three years as a full-time volunteer under the Peace Corps Act;

serving for up to three years as a full-time volunteer under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973;

required medical care for the applicant or the applicant’s immediate family;

being a person who otherwise qualifies as a resident and is accompanying a spouse who qualifies as a resident under (i) — (iv) of this paragraph;

an absence allowed under (D)(i) — (iv) of this paragraph; or

is a dependent of a parent or guardian who has been physically present in the state for at least one year immediately before the parent or guardian was absent from the state, the parent or guardian intends to return permanently to the state, and the absence is due solely to

participating in a foreign exchange student program recognized by the commission;

attending a school as a full-time student;

full-time employment by the state;

being a member of or employed full-time by the state’s congressional delegation;

being a person who otherwise qualifies as a resident and is accompanying a spouse who qualifies as a resident under (i) — (iv) of this paragraph;

does not have a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application or loan disbursement;

has not, within the previous five years, had a loan discharged or written off by the commission for any reason;

does not have a status, at the time of the application for a loan or disbursement of loan funds, that would prevent the person from repaying the loan as it becomes due;

has not within the previous seven years defaulted on another loan made to the person by a lending entity unless the person can show good faith efforts to repay the loan and extraordinary circumstances that led to the default;

does not have a credit history, at the time of application for a loan, that demonstrates chronic inability or unwillingness to pay an extension of credit or loan as it becomes due; and

has complied with the military selective service registration requirements imposed under 50 U.S.C. App. 453 (Military Selective Service Act), if those requirements were applicable to the person.

A person does not qualify as a resident of the state under this section if the person declares or establishes residence in another state during an absence from Alaska.

A person may not be awarded an education loan under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.160

if that person receives a teacher education loan under AS

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

for the same period of attendance.

Notwithstanding (a)(6) — (8) of this section, the commission may issue a loan to a person if another person who satisfies the requirements of (a)(2) and (a)(4) — (8) of this section cosigns the loan.

The commission may withhold disbursement of a loan if the borrower becomes ineligible under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 10 ch 89 SLA 1981; am § 9 ch 67 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 34 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 116 SLA 1986; am § 10 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 16 ch 43 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 112 SLA 1994; am §§ 15, 16 ch 5 SLA 1996; am §§ 6, 7 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 22 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2002)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 14.40.765. Renumbered in 1982.

In 1992, in (a)(4) of this section, “AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

” was substituted for “AS 47.23.160 — 47.23.220” to reflect the 1990 renumbering of AS 47.23.160 — 47.23.220. In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to “child support services agency” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Administrative Code. —

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

Editor's notes. —

50 U.S.C App. 453 is cited in paragraph (a)(9). On December 1, 2015, the Office of the Law Revision Counsel transferred 50 U.S.C App 453 to 50 U.S.C. 3802 See http://uscode.house.gov/editorialreclassification/t50a-elim/index.html

For provision relating to the applicability of 23.40.070 — 23.40.260 to employees of an authority established under 29.35.800 — 29.35.925, see 29.35.880.

Sec. 14.43.130.
Selection criteria. [Repealed, § 19 ch 67 SLA 1983.]

Sec. 14.43.135.
Discrimination prohibited.

The programs established under this chapter shall be carried out without regard to the applicant’s or participant’s race, creed, sex, color, ancestry, national origin, or membership in fraternal or political organizations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 23 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.40.769. Renumbered in 1982.

Cross references. —

See also AS 14.18 and AS 18.80.

Sec. 14.43.140.
Enforceability of certain contracts with minors.

A written obligation entered into by a minor at least 16 years of age, evidencing a loan or other assistance received by the minor from any person for the purpose of furthering the minor’s education in a career education program or an institution of higher learning, is enforceable against the minor with the same effect as if the minor were, at the time of its execution, 18 years of age, if the person making the loan has before making the loan a certification from the institution that the minor is enrolled in the institution or has been accepted for enrollment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1971; am § 19 ch 32 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.771

. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 14.43.145.
Default.

For the purposes of this chapter, a loan is in default after a loan payment has become 180 or more days past due or, for a loan under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

or

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

, the default requirements established by the commission have been met. Upon default,

repayment of the remaining balance is accelerated and due;

the commission may take the borrower’s permanent fund dividend under AS

43.23.160

;

the commission may issue an order to withhold and deliver under AS

14.43.147

;

[Repealed, § 34 ch 23 SLA 2018.]

the commission may record the lien created under AS

14.43.149

; and

the commission may establish an administrative collection order under AS

14.43.151

—

14.43.155

.

The commission shall notify the borrower of the default, and the consequences of default imposed under (a) of this section, by mailing a notice to the borrower’s most recent address provided to the commission by the borrower or obtained by the commission.

A borrower may appeal a notice of default by filing a statement with the executive director, within 30 days after the date of the notice, requesting that the loan status be reviewed. AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) does not apply to the review of default under this section. The borrower has the burden to show that, at the time of the notice of default, (1) no loan payment was more than 180 days past due or, for a loan under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

or

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

, the default requirements established by the commission had not yet been met; or (2) that the borrower entered into, and was in compliance with, a default forbearance agreement with the commission. Within 40 days after receiving a written request for review, the director shall inform the borrower in writing of the executive director’s decision. The decision of the executive director is a final decision that may be appealed to the superior court under the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 1997; am §§ 24 — 26 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 34 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2018, “AS

43.23.160

” was substituted for “43.23.067” in paragraph (a)(2) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, repealed (a)(4).

Sec. 14.43.147.
Order to withhold and deliver.

Thirty days after the date a notice of default under AS

14.43.145(b)

is mailed or the date of the decision of the executive director under AS

14.43.145(c)

, whichever is later, the commission may issue an order to withhold and deliver property to a person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, who the commission has reason to believe possesses property due, owing, or belonging to the borrower.

The order to withhold and deliver shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, possessing the property. The order must state the amount of the borrower’s liability and include notice of the terms of this section. All real and personal property, including earnings, that are due, owing, or belonging to the borrower are subject to an order to withhold and deliver.

A person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, served with an order to withhold and deliver, is required to make true answers under oath and in writing to inquiries contained in the order within three weeks after service of the order and to all inquiries subsequently made.

Upon receipt of the order, the person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, shall immediately withhold property due, owing, or belonging to the borrower and shall deliver the property to the commission after three weeks have expired from the date of the service of the order. Money shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the commission.

An employer shall withhold the earnings of a borrower subject to an order at each succeeding interval of payment until the entire amount of the debt stated in the order has been withheld. An employer may, for each payment made under an order to withhold and deliver, deduct $5 from other wages or salary owed to the borrower.

If a borrower who is subject to an order terminates employment, the employer shall promptly notify the commission and provide the borrower’s last known home address and the name and address of the borrower’s new employer, if known. The employer shall keep a record of the order for two years after the borrower terminates employment. If the employer reemploys the borrower within that two-year period, the employer shall immediately reimplement the order unless the employer has received notice of satisfaction under (j) of this section.

An employer may not discharge, discipline, or refuse to employ a borrower on the basis of an order issued under this section. A person who violates this subsection or a regulation adopted to implement it is liable for a civil penalty of not more than $10,000. The employee may seek restitution or reinstatement from the employer.

A person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, who complies with an order to withhold and deliver that is regular on its face is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency for conduct in compliance with the notice. A state agency that complies with an order to withhold and deliver that is regular on its face is not required to pay interest under AS

37.05.285

for failure to make timely payment to the borrower.

An order to withhold and deliver under this section is subject to the exemptions under AS 09.38.

Upon satisfaction of a loan obligation, the commission shall, within 15 working days, notify all persons served with an order under this section that the order is no longer in force. If the commission receives money under an order after satisfaction of the loan, the commission shall within 15 working days return the overpayment to the borrower. If the commission fails to return an overpayment as required under this subsection, the commission is liable to the borrower for the amount of the overpayment, plus legal interest under AS

45.45.010

.

If a person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, knowingly fails to make an answer to an order under this section within the time prescribed, or knowingly fails to honor an order under this section, the person, or agency or political subdivision of the state, is liable to the commission in an amount equal to 100 percent of the amount that is the basis of the order, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney fees. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

A borrower against whom an order has been served under this section may apply for relief to the superior court.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.43.148.
Nonrenewal of license.

History.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 23 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 14.43.149.
Lien.

The amount owing on a loan that is in default under this chapter, including principal, interest, and collection costs, is a lien upon all property and right to property, real or personal, belonging to the borrower. The lien arises at the time that the commission mails or otherwise delivers a notice of default under AS

14.43.145(b)

and continues until the balance of the loan, including principal, interest, and collection costs, is paid in full.

A lien created under (a) of this section is

not valid against a mortgagee or other lienholder, pledgee, purchaser, or judgment creditor until notice of the lien is recorded in the records of the recording district where the property subject to the lien is situated; and

subject to AS

40.19.040(d)

.

History.

(§ 27 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in (b)(2), “AS

40.19.040(d)

” was substituted for “AS

40.19.040(e)

” to reflect the 2001 renumbering of AS

40.19.040(e)

.

Sec. 14.43.150.
Order to assign wages for defaulted loan.

In a court proceeding regarding a defaulted loan under this chapter in which the court has entered judgment in favor of the commission, the court may, on its own motion or motion of the commission, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, order the loan recipient to assign to the commission that portion of salary or wages due the loan recipient currently and in the future in an amount sufficient to pay the amount ordered by the court to be repaid to the commission.

The order of assignment is binding upon an employer upon service of a copy of the order upon the employer and until further order of the court or until the employment of the obligee is terminated. The employer may, for each payment made under the order, deduct $1 from other wages or salary owed to the employee.

An employer may not terminate an employee’s employment because wages of the employee are subject to an order under this section.

An assignment of wages authorized under this section that is made under court order has priority as against an attachment, execution, or other assignment, except for an assignment for payment of child support under AS

25.27.070

, restitution to a crime victim authorized under AS

12.55.045

, or as otherwise ordered by the court.

History.

(§ 7 ch 112 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 5 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.43.151.
Authority and procedure to administratively establish and enforce a collection order.

If a judgment in favor of the commission has not been entered by the court regarding a defaulted loan awarded under this chapter, the commission may establish a duty to repay the defaulted loan through a collection order using the procedures prescribed in AS

14.43.152

—

14.43.155

and may enforce the collection order. Action under this section may be undertaken at the commission’s discretion if the borrower is in default under AS

14.43.145

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.43.152.
Initiation of administrative action to establish a collection order; required notice.

An action to establish a collection order authorized under AS

14.43.151

is initiated by the commission’s serving on the borrower a notice of establishment of collection order. The notice shall be served by mailing the notice to the borrower at

the borrower’s most recent address provided to the commission by the borrower; or

another address known to the commission.

The notice served under (a) of this section must state

the amount of the liability for default under AS

14.43.145

for which the borrower is found to be responsible; the amount stated under this paragraph shall include all principal, interest, and collection fees;

that a lien may be recorded against the borrower’s property as authorized under AS

14.43.145

(a)(5);

that the borrower may appear at a hearing held by the commission and show cause that a collection order should not be entered because, at the time of the notice,

no loan payment was more than 180 days past due or, for a loan under AS

14.43.161

—

14.43.168

or

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

, the default requirements established by the commission had not yet been met; or

the borrower had entered into, or was in compliance with, an agreement to forbear default with the commission; and

that, if the borrower served with the notice does not request a hearing within 30 days after the date of mailing of the notice, a collection order will be entered and the property of the borrower will be subject to a lien under AS

14.43.149

in the amount stated in the collection order without further notice or hearing.

History.

(§ 9 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.43.153.
Hearings in administrative action to establish a collection order; burden of proof.

A borrower served with a notice of establishment of collection order under AS

14.43.152

is entitled to a hearing before the commission if the request for a hearing is served on the commission by registered mail, return receipt requested, within 30 days after the date the notice is mailed to the borrower.

If a request for a hearing in accordance with (a) of this section is made, the issuance of a collection order is automatically stayed pending the decision of the hearing officer for the commission. If a request for a hearing is not made, the collection order is final at the expiration of the 30-day period specified in (a) of this section.

A borrower claiming that the notice is incorrect has the burden at hearing to document the existence of one of the conditions described in AS

14.43.152(b)(3)(A)

and (B).

Within 60 days after the date of the hearing, the hearing officer shall enter a decision determining whether default has occurred and, if default has occurred, specifying the amount of the collection order and declaring that the property of the borrower is subject to a lien under AS

14.43.149

in the amount of the collection order.

If the borrower who requested the hearing fails to appear at the hearing, the hearing officer shall enter a decision

confirming that a default has occurred;

confirming the amount of the collection order;

declaring that the property of the borrower is subject to a lien under AS

14.43.149

in the amount stated under (2) of this subsection.

The decision of the hearing officer is a final decision that may be appealed to the superior court under the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

(§ 9 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.43.154.
Collection orders as judgments.

A collection order is equivalent to a judgment and becomes vested

at the expiration of the 30-day period described in AS

14.43.153(b)

if a hearing is not requested; or

on the date the hearing officer enters a decision in favor of the commission if a hearing was requested by the borrower.

History.

(§ 9 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.43.155.
Nature of remedies.

AS

14.43.154

provides a remedy in addition to and not as a substitute for any other remedies available to the commission.

History.

(§ 9 ch 63 SLA 2004)